Utah statutes.
53A-1a-707.   Board to make rules.
In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act,
the board shall make rules consistent with this part establishing:
(1)  the eligibility of students to participate in the scholarship program;
and
(2)  the application process for the scholarship program.
